Connecticut, session 2026, HB05504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 13 of number 467 of the special acts of 1943, as
2 amended by number 56 of the special acts of 1949, number 10 of the
3 special acts of 1957, section 2 of special act 74-29, special act 76-36,
4 special act 87-58, special act 89-35 and section 23 of special act 09-13, is
5 amended to read as follows (Effective from passage):
6 The board of governors of the Cornfield Point Association shall
7 prepare and submit a budget to said association at each annual meeting
8 [a budget] of the association and recommend a tax assessment [for the
9 purpose of and] based upon said budget, [but not to exceed five
10 hundred] provided no such assessment shall exceed one thousand
11 dollars on each lot of land having a dwelling or cottage thereon, [located
12 within the limits of the association, and not to exceed one] or two
13 hundred dollars on each vacant lot, [located within the limits of said
HB5504 / File No. 257 1

HB5504 File No. 257
14 association,] as the same shall appear of record on October first of the
15 preceding year. [Said] The association shall have the power to decrease
16 said budget [and] or rate of tax assessment recommended by [said] the
17 board of governors, but in no case shall [it have the power to] the
18 association increase [the] such budget [and] or rate of tax assessment.
19 The rate of tax assessment recommended by the board of governors
20 shall be final unless decreased by the association at such annual
21 meeting. The tax collector of [said] the association shall collect such tax
22 assessments and keep a tax record, [shall be kept and] signed by the
23 secretary of [said] the association, on or before the first Saturday of
24 October in each year. [and warrants may be issued] The tax collector
25 may issue a warrant for the collection of money due on [the] annual bills
26 [,] pursuant to the provisions of section 12-145 of the general statutes.
27 Such tax assessment shall be a lien upon the property upon which it
28 [shall be] is laid. [and such] Such lien may be continued by certificate
29 and shall be recorded on the land records of the town of Old Saybrook
30 pursuant to the provisions of the general statutes relating to continuance
31 of tax liens.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage Number 467 of the
special acts of 1943, Sec.
13
PD Joint Favorable
HB5504 / File No. 257 2

HB5504 File No. 257
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Special District Cornfield Point Revenue None See Below
Association Gain
Explanation
The bill amends the charter of the Cornfield Point Association special
district within Old Saybrook to allow increased assessments on
property located within the district. This results in a revenue gain to the
district beginning in FY 28 that is dependent on the amount of the
assessment and the number of properties on which it is assessed.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
HB5504 / File No. 257 3

HB5504 File No. 257
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5504
AN ACT AMENDING THE CHARTER OF THE CORNFIELD POINT
ASSOCIATION.